Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 20 Processing, Grading, Labeling, and Marketing of Products
2-20-603. Penalties.

Any buyer who fails to file a report or pay any assessment within the required time set by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall forfeit to the secretary a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due plus one percent (1%) for each month of delay, or fraction of a month, after the first month after the report was required to be filed or the assessment became due.

The penalty shall be paid to the secretary and shall be disposed of by him or her in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of the assessment imposed in this subchapter.

The secretary shall collect the penalty levied in this subchapter, together with the delinquent assessment, by any or all of the following methods:

Voluntary payment by the person liable;

Legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Injunctive relief to enjoin any buyer owing an assessment or penalty from operating his or her business or engaging in business as a buyer of wheat until the delinquent assessment or penalty is paid.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this subchapter who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises or any book, record, or other document relating to the liability of the person for the assessment imposed in this subchapter or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent the inspection shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (a) and (b).

Three (3) members shall represent the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation;

Two (2) members shall represent Riceland Foods, Inc.;

Two (2) members shall represent the Arkansas Association of Wheat Growers; and

Two (2) members shall represent the Agricultural Council of Arkansas.

All of the nine (9) members of the board shall be practical producers of wheat in the State of Arkansas and shall be nominated by their respective organizations.

Each year, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the terms of the current board members whose terms expire in that year, the organizations named above shall submit to the Governor names of two (2) nominees for each position to be filled on the board from the respective organizations, and the Governor shall appoint the new members from each list of nominees.

Each member selected shall serve for a term of two (2) years and until his or her successor is duly selected as provided in this section.

The board may establish rules for its own government and for the administration of affairs of the board.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1985, No. 283, § 2, provided, in part:

“The Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board is created to be domiciled in Little Rock, Arkansas, 10720 Kanis Road, to be composed of nine producer members to be appointed by the Governor as herein provided.”

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 2, also provided, in part, that, within ten days after August 1, 1985, each of the organizations named in this section should submit the names of five practical wheat producers to the Governor and that he or she should appoint three members from the list submitted by the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., and two members from the lists submitted by each of the other organizations to serve on the board. The members selected from the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., were to draw lots to determine their terms so that two of them would serve for terms of two years and one would serve for a term of one year. The members from each of the other organizations would draw lots for terms so that one would serve for a term of one year and one would serve for a term of two years.

Ballots will be furnished by the board.

The results shall be certified not more than three (3) days after election, on forms furnished by the board, by registered mail to the board.

The board shall be reimbursed from funds collected for costs of holding referenda.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As amended by Acts 1995, No. 107, § 1, subdivision (a)(1) ended: “from July 1, 1995.” Subdivision (a)(3) began: “The assessment imposed in this section shall be effective beginning July 1, 1995.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(1).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(3); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (b)(1) and (2).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2404; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 16; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3283, 3284.

2-20-604. Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board.

The Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board is created.

(1)The board shall be composed of nine (9) producer members to be appointed by the Governor as follows:

The members of the board shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by those officers or specifically designated by the board.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2402; Acts 1999, No. 351, § 2.

2-20-605. Referendum in each county.

The Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board shall appoint three (3) wheat producers from each county who will be responsible for holding a referendum in the county.

The board will set the dates for the referendum.

In all such referenda, in order to be eligible to vote, the producer must have produced wheat in the crop year immediately preceding the referendum.

Voting shall be in United States Farm Service Agency offices under supervision of the three (3) producers appointed to hold the referendum.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2403.

2-20-606. Assessments on grown wheat.

(1)There is imposed and levied an assessment at the rate of one cent (1¢) per bushel on all wheat grown within the state.

This assessment shall be deducted from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale, whether within or without the state, or at the point the wheat enters into the United States Department of Agriculture loan program.

This assessment may be extended for an indefinite period of time or until twenty percent (20%) of the producers ask for return of funds; then another referendum shall be called by the Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board in the manner set forth in this subchapter.

(1)The assessment imposed and levied by this section shall be collected by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration from the buyer of wheat at the first point of sale or when the wheat enters the United States Department of Agriculture loan program.

(A)The proceeds of the assessment, less not more than three percent (3%) to cover cost of collections, shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State in a special fund to be established for the board to the credit of the board.

Disbursement shall be made only upon motions duly passed by the board and presented to the Treasurer of State, and only for purposes prescribed in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2403; Acts 1995, No. 107, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3285.

2-20-607. Records and other documentation.

(1)Every buyer shall keep a complete and accurate record of all wheat handled by him or her.

The records shall be in such form and contain other information as the Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board shall prescribe, by rule.

The record shall be preserved for a period of one (1) year and shall be offered for inspection at any time upon written demand by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or any duly authorized agent or representative of him or her.

(1)At such times as the secretary may require, every buyer shall submit reports or otherwise document any information deemed necessary for the efficient collection of the assessment imposed in this subchapter.

The secretary shall have the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter upon the premises of any buyer of wheat and examine or cause to be examined by the agent any books, papers, and records which deal in any way with respect to the payment of the assessment or enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2403; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 3286, 3287.

2-20-608. Refunds to producers.

Any wheat producer may request and receive a refund of the amount deducted from the sale of his or her wheat if:

He or she makes a written application with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration within forty-five (45) days from the date of sale, supported by copies of sales slips signed by the purchaser; and

The application is filed before the annual accounting is made of the funds not later than July 1 each year.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (1).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2403; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3288.

2-20-609. Promotion program — Use of funds.

The Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board shall plan and conduct a program of research, extension, market development, and advertising designed to promote the wheat industry in Arkansas.

The board is authorized to use the funds derived from the assessments imposed in this subchapter for these purposes, including basic administration expenses of the plan.

Use of these funds may be applied, as prescribed in this section, within or without the State of Arkansas, including regional, national, and international applications.

The funds may also be used to defray costs of referenda.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2406.

2-20-610. Resident agent.

The resident agent of the Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board shall be the executive vice president of Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, or his or her designee.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 107, § 2.

Subchapter 7

— Regulation of Ginseng

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 774, § 6: July 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under federal law, the state must institute a program providing for the regulation of the harvesting and exportation of ginseng from the state or the federal government will prohibit all exportation of ginseng from the state; that in 1979, the General Assembly enacted legislation charging the State Forestry Commission with responsibility of regulating the harvesting and sale of ginseng; that it is now determined that it is more appropriate that such authority and responsibility be vested in the State Plant Board; that this act is designed to vest authority and responsibility regarding ginseng in the State Plant Board and that to assure the smooth, effective and efficient transfer of the authority from the Forestry Commission to the State Plant Board and to enable the State Plant Board to promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to carry out the purpose and intent of this act, it is desirable that this act be effective beginning July 1, 1985. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

2-20-701. Authority to regulate.

Effective July 1, 1985, the State Plant Board shall have the authority and responsibility to regulate the harvesting, sale, artificial propagation, and exportation of Panax quinquefolius, referred to in this subchapter as “ginseng”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 774, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-140.

2-20-702. Rules.

The State Plant Board is authorized and directed to promulgate appropriate rules to enable it to effectively and efficiently carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter.

Rules shall include, but shall not be limited to:

Requirement of annual certification and registration of ginseng dealers and exporters;

Requirement that ginseng dealers and exporters maintain records of all their purchases and sales of ginseng;

The establishment of a limited ginseng harvesting season designed to promote and assure the survival of wild American ginseng in the state;

Requirement to obtain a permit or certificate from the board by any person desiring to artificially propagate ginseng and to provide for the inspection of cultivated ginseng and ginseng nurseries in the state; and

A requirement that a certificate of legal taking be attached to all ginseng exported from the state.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 774, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-141.

2-20-703. Research program.

The State Plant Board shall cause to be initiated and maintained such continuing research program concerning ginseng in Arkansas as it may deem necessary or appropriate to promote and assure the continued health and survival of wild American ginseng in the state.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 774, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-142.

2-20-704. Dealer license — Fee.

Each person or entity desiring to engage in business as a ginseng dealer in this state shall annually make application for and obtain a license to do so from the State Plant Board.

The annual license fee for a ginseng dealer license shall be fifty dollars ($50.00), which shall accompany the application for the license.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-7 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 271, § 10: July 1, 1997.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 774, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-143.

2-20-705. Artificial propagation fee.

A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be assessed persons artificially propagating ginseng for sale.

The fee will be assessed annually and will accompany the request for nursery certification.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 774, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-143.

Subchapter 8

— Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion

2-20-801. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the growth and development of the corn and grain sorghum industry in Arkansas by research, extension, promotion, and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 271, § 1.

2-20-802. Penalties.

Any buyer who fails to file a report or pay any assessment within the required time set by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall forfeit to the secretary a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due plus one percent (1%) for each month of delay, or fraction of a month, after the first month after the report was required to be filed or the assessment became due.

The penalty shall be paid to the secretary and shall be disposed of by him or her in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of the assessment imposed in this subchapter.

The secretary shall collect the penalty levied in this section, together with the delinquent assessment, by any or all of the following methods:

Voluntary payment by the person liable;

Legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Injunctive relief to enjoin any buyer owing the assessment or penalty, or both, from operating his or her business or engaging in business as a buyer of corn or grain sorghum until the delinquent assessment or penalty, or both, is paid.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this subchapter who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises or any book, record, or other document relating to the liability of the person for the assessment imposed by this subchapter or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent the inspection shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “or” for “and” in (b)(2); and substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (a) and (b).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 271, § 4; 2005, No. 1994, § 17; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3289, 3290.

2-20-803. Applicability of subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to any person who purchases one thousand (1,000) or less bushels of corn or grain sorghum in any calendar year.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 271, § 5.

2-20-804. Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board.

The Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board is created and domiciled in Little Rock, Arkansas, 10720 Kanis Road, and is composed of seven (7) producer members appointed by the Governor as provided in this subsection.

All of the seven (7) producer members of the board shall be practical producers of corn or grain sorghum in the State of Arkansas and shall be nominated by their respective organizations.

Within ten (10) days following July 1, 1997, each of the following organizations, namely, the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, Riceland Foods, Inc., and the Agricultural Council of Arkansas, shall submit the names of five (5) practical corn or grain sorghum producers to the Governor, and he or she shall appoint three (3) members from the list submitted by the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, and two (2) members from the lists submitted by each of the other above-named organizations to serve on the board.

The members selected as provided in this section from the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, shall draw lots to determine their terms so that two (2) of the members will serve for terms of two (2) years and one (1) shall serve for a term of one (1) year, and the members from each of the other organizations shall draw lots for terms so that one (1) shall serve for a term of one (1) year and one (1) shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Thereafter, each member selected shall serve for a term of two (2) years and until his or her successor is duly selected as provided in this section.

Each year thereafter not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the terms of the current board members whose terms expire, the organizations named in subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall submit to the Governor names of two (2) nominees named for each position to be filled on the board from the respective organizations, and the Governor shall appoint from each list of nominees the new member or members.

The members of the board shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by the officers or specifically designated by the board.

The board may establish rules for its own government and for the administration of affairs of the board.

The resident agent of the board shall be the executive vice president of the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, or his or her designee.

Every buyer shall keep a complete and accurate record of all corn and grain sorghum handled by him or her.

The records shall be in such form and contain other information as the board shall by rule prescribe.

The record shall be preserved for a period of one (1) year and shall be offered for inspection at any time upon written demand by the secretary or any duly authorized agent or representative of the secretary.

Every buyer, at such time or times as the secretary may require, shall submit reports or otherwise document any information deemed necessary for the efficient collection of the assessment imposed in this section.

The secretary shall have the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter upon the premises of any buyer of corn or grain sorghum and examine or cause to be examined by the agent any book, paper, and record which deal in any way with respect to the payment of the assessment or enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (d)(3) through (d)(5).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1963, No. 118, § 2, provided that the provisions of the act, which amended numerous sections in this chapter, should not be construed as limiting the authority conferred upon the State Plant Board by §2-16-201 et seq., but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

Effective Dates. Acts 1919, No. 683, § 11: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Apr. 3, 1919.

Am. Jur. 3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agri., § 51.

C.J.S. 3 C.J.S., Agri., § 87.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 271, § 2.

2-20-805. Powers and duties — Assessments — Buyers' records.

(1)The Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board shall appoint three (3) corn or grain sorghum producers from each county who will be responsible for holding a referendum in the county.

The board will set the dates for the referendum and prescribe procedures to be followed in conducting the referendum.

Voting shall be in farm service agency offices under supervision of the three (3) producers appointed to hold the referendum.

Ballots will be furnished by the board.

The results shall be certified not more than three (3) days after election on forms furnished by the board by registered mail to the board.

The board shall be reimbursed from funds collected for costs of holding the referendum.

(1)There is imposed and levied an assessment at the rate of one cent (1¢) per bushel on all corn and grain sorghum grown within the state.

This assessment is to be deducted from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale, whether within or without the state or at the point the corn or grain sorghum enters into the United States Department of Agriculture loan program. However, the assessment shall not be imposed unless and until:

The question of its imposition has been submitted to and approved by sixty percent (60%) of the corn and grain sorghum producers who vote in the referendum to be called and held within nine (9) months following July 1, 1997; and

A minimum of ten percent (10%) of the total corn and grain sorghum producers in this state as determined by latest available agricultural census data shall have voted.

The corn and grain sorghum producers shall be notified by the board of the results of the referendum.

The assessment imposed in this section shall be effective beginning July 1, 1998.

This assessment may be extended for an indefinite period of time or until twenty percent (20%) of the producers shall petition the board to hold a referendum on whether the program should be continued, then another referendum shall be called by the board in the manner set forth in this section.

In all such referenda, in order to be eligible to vote, the producer must have produced corn or grain sorghum in the crop year immediately preceding the referendum.

(1)The assessment imposed and levied by this section shall be collected by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration from the buyer of corn or grain sorghum at the first point of sale or when the corn or grain sorghum enters the United States Department of Agriculture loan program.

The proceeds of the assessment, less not more than three percent (3%) to cover the cost of collections, shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State in a special fund to be established for the board to the credit of the board. Disbursement from the special fund shall be made only upon a motion duly passed by the board and presented to the Treasurer of State and only for a purpose prescribed in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 271, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3291, 3292.

2-20-806. Research and extension program.

(1)The Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board shall plan and conduct a program of research and extension designed to promote the corn and grain sorghum industry in Arkansas, and the board may use the funds derived from the assessments imposed in this subchapter for these purposes, including basic administration expenses of the plan.

This program may include a program of market development as determined by the board.

(1)Use of these funds may be applied as prescribed in this subchapter within or without the State of Arkansas, including regional, national, and international applications.

The funds may also be used to defray costs of referenda.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 271, § 6.

2-20-507. Assessments on grown rice.

2-20-510. Promotion and research programs.